Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-602
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Carbon Monoxide Safety Act:

(1) Carbon monoxide alarm means a device that detects carbon monoxide and that:

(a) Produces a distinct, audible alarm;

(b) Is listed by a nationally recognized, independent product-safety testing and certification laboratory to conform to the standards for carbon monoxide alarms issued by such laboratory as determined by the State Fire Marshal;

(c)(i) Is battery-powered;

(ii) Plugs into a dwelling's electrical outlet and has a battery backup;

(iii) Is wired into a dwelling's electrical system and has a battery backup; or

(iv) Is connected to an electrical system via an electrical panel; and

(d) May be combined with a smoke detecting device if the combined device complies with applicable law regarding both smoke detecting devices and carbon monoxide alarms and if the carbon monoxide alarm is distinct and descriptively annunciated from a smoke detecting alarm;

(2) Dwelling unit means a single unit providing complete independent living facilities for one or more persons, including permanent provisions for living, sleeping, eating, cooking, and sanitation;

(3) Fuel means coal, kerosene, oil, fuel gases, or other petroleum products or hydrocarbon products such as wood that emit carbon monoxide as a byproduct of combustion;

(4) Installed means that a carbon monoxide alarm is installed in a dwelling unit in accordance with the National Fire Protection Association Standard 720 as such standard existed on January 1, 2015, and in accordance with the instructions for installation from the manufacturer, in one of the following ways:

(a) If the alarm is battery-powered, attached to the wall or ceiling of the dwelling unit;

(b) Directly plugged into an electrical outlet without a switch other than a circuit breaker; or

(c) Wired directly into the dwelling's electrical system;

(5) Multifamily dwelling means any improved real property used or intended to be used as a residence and that contains more than one dwelling unit. Multifamily dwelling includes a condominium or cooperative;

(6) Operational means working and in service in accordance with the manufacturer's instructions; and

(7) Single-family dwelling means any improved real property used or intended to be used as a residence and that contains one dwelling unit.

Laws 2015, LB34, § 2.